Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 14
OIL OR HAZARDOUS MATERIAL SPILLS OR RELEASES

Sec.

Code Commission notes.

- Two 1988 Acts added a new Chapter 13 to this title. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 2072 has retained the Chapter 13 designation, but the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 354 has been redesignated as Chapter 14 and the Code sections have been renumbered accordingly.

12-14-1. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

"Animal waste" means feces, urine, or other excrement, digestive emission, urea, or similar substances emitted by animals, including any form of livestock, poultry, or fish. This term includes animal waste that is mixed or commingled with bedding, compost, feed, soil, or any other material typically mixed or commingled with animal waste on a farm.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Farm" means a site or area, including associated structures, that is used for:

The production of one or more crops; or

The raising or selling of animals, including livestock, poultry, or fish.

"Hazardous substance" means any substance designated pursuant to Section 311(b)(2)(A) of the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. Section 1321(b)(2)(A); any element, compound, mixture, solution, or substance designated pursuant to Section 102 of 42 U.S.C. Section 9602; any hazardous waste having the characteristics identified under or listed pursuant to Section 3001 of the Solid Waste Disposal Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 6921, but not including any waste the regulation of which under the Solid Waste Disposal Act has been suspended by act of Congress; any toxic pollutant listed under Section 307(a) of the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. Section 1317(a); any hazardous air pollutant listed under Section 112 of the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 7412; and any imminently hazardous chemical substance or mixture with respect to which the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency has taken action pursuant to Section 7 of the Toxic Substance Control Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 2606. The term does not include petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, which is not otherwise specifically listed or designated as a hazardous substance in the first sentence of this paragraph, and the term does not include natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquefied natural gas, synthetic gas usable for fuel, or mixtures of natural gas and such synthetic gas.

"Oil" includes but is not limited to gasoline, crude oil, fuel oil, diesel oil, lubricating oil, sludge, oil refuse, oil mixed with wastes, and any other petroleum related product.

"Person" includes an individual, trust, firm, joint-stock company, corporation, partnership, association, county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, interstate body, the state and any agency or authority thereof, and the federal government and any agency thereof.

"Reportable quantity" means the amount of a hazardous substance which, if released into the environment in such quantity within any 24 hour period, must be reported to the division in the event of a spill or release. The reportable quantity for mixtures is the amount of the hazardous substance components of a mixture. Reportable quantities are those listed in 40 C.F.R. Part 302 - Designation, Reportable Quantities and Notification.

"Spill or release" means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, emitting, releasing, leaking, or placing of any hazardous substance into the air or into or on any land or water of the state, except from an underground storage tank and all plumbing and piping relating thereto or except high-level or low-level radioactive waste from a federally licensed nuclear facility or as authorized by state or federal law or a permit from the division. This term shall also mean the discharge of oil into waters of this state which will cause a significant film or sheen upon or discoloration of the surface of such waters or adjoining shorelines or cause a sludge or emulsion to be deposited beneath the surface of such waters or upon adjoining shorelines. Accidental discharges of oil made by an individual during maintenance of that individual's personal vehicle or farm machinery shall be exempt.

(Code 1981, §

12-14-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 354, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1371, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12; Ga. L. 2019, p. 565, § 1/HB 223.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added paragraph (1); redesignated former paragraphs (1) through (3) as present paragraphs (2) through (4), respectively; added paragraph (5); and redesignated former paragraphs (4) through (8) as present paragraphs (6) through (10), respectively.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, "usable" was substituted for "usuable" in paragraph (4) (now paragraph (6)).

12-14-2. Reporting spilled or released oil or hazardous substance; promulgation of rules and regulations by Board of Natural Resources.

Oil or any hazardous substance spilled or released shall be reported under Code Section 12-14-3.
The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.

(Code 1981, §

12-14-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 354, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1371, § 2.)

12-14-3. Notification of Environmental Protection Division of spill or release; exceptions; development of procedures to notify other governmental agencies.

Any person owning or having control over any oil or hazardous substance who has knowledge of any spill or release of such oil or who has knowledge of any spill or release of such hazardous substance in a quantity equal to or exceeding the reportable quantity or who has knowledge of a spill or release of an unknown quantity of oil or a hazardous substance shall immediately notify the division through the Department of Natural Resources Emergency Operations Center as soon as that person knows of the spill or release.

This Code section shall not apply to:

The application of a pesticide product registered under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. Section 136, et seq., or the Georgia Pesticide Control Act, Code Section 2-7-50, et seq., or both, when the application of such pesticide is made in a manner consistent with its label or labeling; or

Air emissions from animal waste, including decomposing animal waste, at a farm.

The division shall develop procedures to provide notice to other state, federal, or local governmental agencies.

(Code 1981, §

12-14-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 354, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1371, § 3; Ga. L. 2019, p. 565, § 2/HB 223.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added subsection (b); and redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c).

12-14-4. Civil penalties; procedures for imposing penalties.

Any person knowingly violating any provision of this chapter or rules or regulations established pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.00 per day. Each day during which the violation continues may be considered a separate violation.

Whenever the director has probable cause to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter, a violation of any rule or regulation of the board, or a violation of any order of the director has occurred, he may attempt to remedy the same by conference, conciliation, and persuasion. In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to correct or remedy any violation, the director may issue an order directed to such violator or violators. The order shall specify the provisions of the chapter, the rules and regulations, or the order alleged to have been violated and the director may direct that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in the order. Any order issued by the director under this subsection shall be signed by the director. Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing which shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 12-2-2.

Whenever the director has probable cause to believe that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, he may, upon written request, cause a hearing to be conducted before a hearing officer appointed by the board. Upon a finding that such person has violated any provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter, the hearing officer shall issue his initial decision imposing civil penalties as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section. Such hearing and any administrative or judicial review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with Code Section 12-2-2.

In rendering a decision under subsection (c) of this Code section imposing civil penalties, the hearing officer shall consider all factors which are relevant, including, but not limited to, the following:

The amount of assessment necessary to ensure immediate and continued compliance and the extent to which the violator may have profited by failing or delaying compliance;

The character and degree of impact of the violation on the natural resources of the state, especially any rare or unique natural phenomena;

The conduct of the person incurring the civil penalty in taking all feasible steps or procedures necessary or appropriate to correct the violation;

Any prior violations by such person, or failures by such person to comply with, statutes or regulations;

The character and degree of injury to, or interference with, public health, safety, or welfare which is caused or threatened to be caused by such violation; and

The character and degree of injury to, or interference with, reasonable use of property which is caused by such violation.

All civil penalties recovered by the director as provided in this Code section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

(Code 1981, §

12-14-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 354, § 1.)